Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-270
Offstreet parking; own, purchase, construct, equip, lease, or operate; right of eminent domain.

Any city of the primary class in Nebraska may own, purchase, construct, equip, lease, or operate within such city offstreet motor vehicle parking facilities for the use of the general public. Any such city shall have the authority to acquire by grant, contract, purchase, or through the condemnation of property, as provided in sections 76-704 to 76-724, all real or personal property, including a site or sites on which to construct such facilities, necessary or convenient in the carrying out of this grant of power.

Laws 1967, c. 51, § 2, p. 185;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 80.
November 14, 2020